Maryland, session 2025, HB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
24–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Program” means the [AIDS] HIV Prevention [Sterile Needle and] Syringe
[Exchange Pilot] SERVICES Program.
24–802.
(a) There is an [AIDS] HIV Prevention [Sterile Needle and] Syringe [Exchange
Pilot] SERVICES Program in the Baltimore City Health Department.
– 1 –

Ch. 758 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The Program shall:
(1) [Provide] DISTRIBUTE SYRINGES AND PROVIDE for the exchange by
participants of used hypodermic needles and syringes for sterile hypodermic needles and
syringes AS NEEDED; and
(2) Operate in accordance with the procedures approved, with the advice
and approval of the oversight committee, by the Commissioner of Health.
24–803.
The Program shall:
(1) Be designed and maintained to provide [maximum security of exchange
locations and equipment, including] security measures [that may be] AND PROCESSES
required to [control the use and dispersal of] SAFELY DISTRIBUTE hypodermic needles
and syringes and [security measures that allow for a full accounting of] ACCOUNT FOR the
number of hypodermic needles and syringes [in circulation] EXCHANGED AND
DISTRIBUTED BY THE BALTIMORE CITY HEALTH DEPARTMENT and the number of
hypodermic needles and syringes in storage;
(2) Be operated to allow participants to exchange used hypodermic needles
and syringes at [any exchange location, if more than one location is] available MOBILE
SYRINGE SERVICES SITES;
(3) Include appropriate levels of staff expertise in working with injecting
drug users and adequate staff training in providing community SERVICE PROVIDER
referrals, counseling, and preventive education;
(4) Provide for the dissemination of other preventive means for [curtailing
the spread of the HIV infection] DECREASING THE RISK OF HIV TRANSMISSION;
(5) Provide [a linkage for] referrals to drug counseling and treatment
services, and follow–up to those referrals to assure that participants receive the treatment
they desire;
(6) Educate injecting drug users on the [dangers of contracting the HIV
infection] RISK OF TRANSMITTING HIV or the hepatitis B virus through HIGH–RISK
needle–sharing practices and [unsafe] sexual behaviors;
(7) Include policies and procedures for the screening of applicants to the
Program in order to preclude noninjecting drug users from participating in the Program;
AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 758
(8) [Establish] IMPLEMENT procedures for identifying Program
participants that are consistent with the confidentiality provisions of this subtitle[; and
(9) Establish a method of identification and authorization for Program staff
members who have access to hypodermic needles, syringes, or Program records].
24–804.
(a) The Mayor of Baltimore City shall appoint an oversight committee for the
Program.
(b) The oversight committee shall consist of:
(1) [Two representatives] ONE REPRESENTATIVE from academia who
[specialize] SPECIALIZES in public health issues;
(2) One representative from law enforcement[, nominated by the Secretary
of Public Safety and Correctional Services];
[(3) One representative of the Baltimore City Police Department;]
[(4)] (3) [Two representatives] ONE REPRESENTATIVE from the
Maryland Department of Health[, the Department of Juvenile Services, or the Department
of Education, nominated by the Secretary of Health];
[(5)] (4) One representative of a Baltimore City community group;
[(6)] (5) One representative of an [AIDS] HIV advocacy group;
[(7)] (6) One [drug abuse] ADDICTION treatment counselor;
[(8)] (7) One recovering injecting drug user; and
[(9)] (8) Up to three other individuals whom the [Mayor of Baltimore
City] BALTIMORE CITY HEALTH DEPARTMENT determines to be appropriate for
appointment to the oversight committee.
(c) The oversight committee shall:
(1) Provide advice to the Commissioner of Health and the Program Director
on developing AND REVISING AS NECESSARY:
(i) Program operating procedures for the [furnishing]
DISTRIBUTION and exchange of hypodermic needles and syringes to injecting drug users;
– 3 –

Ch. 758 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A plan for community outreach and education;
(iii) A protocol for providing [a linkage] REFERRALS for Program
participants to [substance abuse] ADDICTION treatment and rehabilitation; and
(iv) A plan for evaluating the Program; and
(2) Provide ongoing oversight of the Program and make recommendations
to the Program Director or the Commissioner of Health regarding any aspect of Program
procedures, operation, or evaluation.
24–805.
(a) The Commissioner of Health shall appoint a Director for the Program.
(b) With the advice [and approval] of the oversight committee, the Director shall
develop AND REVISE AS NECESSARY:
(1) Program operating procedures for the [furnishing] DISTRIBUTION and
exchange of hypodermic needles and syringes to injecting drug users;
(2) A community outreach and education program; and
(3) A protocol for providing [a linkage] REFERRALS for Program
participants to substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation.
(c) The Director shall submit the operating procedures, the plan for a community
outreach and education program, and the [substance abuse] ADDICTION treatment
[linkage] REFERRAL protocol to the Commissioner of Health OR THE COMMISSIONER’S
DESIGNEE for approval prior to THE implementation OF REVISED PROCEDURES.
24–806.
(a) The Baltimore City Health Department shall include in its Program operating
procedures measures to collect the following data:
(1) The number of participants served by the Program;
(2) The length of time a participant is served by the Program;
(3) Demographic profiles of participants served by the Program that
include:
(i) Age;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 758
(ii) Sex;
(iii) Race; AND
[(iv) Occupation;]
[(v)] (IV) Zip code of residence;
[(vi) Types of drugs used;
(vii) Length of drug use; and
(viii) Frequency of injection;]
(4) The number of hypodermic needles and syringes exchanged;
(5) The number of participants [entering drug counseling and] REFERRED
TO ADDICTION treatment; and
(6) The number of referrals made by the Program for [drug counseling and]
ADDICTION treatment FOR PEOPLE WHO INJECT DRUGS.
(b) With the advice [and approval] of the oversight committee, the Baltimore City
Health Department shall develop and implement a plan for Program evaluation that shall
include the following issues:
(1) The ESTIMATED prevalence AND INCIDENCE of HIV among Program
participants;
[(2) Changes in the level of drug use among Program participants;
(3) Changes in the level of needle–sharing among Program participants;
(4) Changes in the use of condoms among Program participants;
(5) The status of treatment and recovery for Program participants who
entered drug treatment programs;
(6) The impact of the Program on risk behaviors for the transmission of the
HIV infection, the hepatitis B virus, and other life–threatening blood–borne diseases
among injecting drug users;
(7) The cost–effectiveness of the Program versus the direct and indirect
costs of the HIV infection in terms of medical treatment and other services normally
required by HIV–infected individuals;]
– 5 –

Ch. 758 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(8)] (2) The strengths and weaknesses of the Program; and
[(9)] (3) The advisability of continuing the Program.
(c) As part of its plans for data collection and Program evaluation described under
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the Baltimore City Health Department shall develop
and implement a methodology[:
(1) For identifying Program hypodermic needles and syringes, such as
through the use of bar coding or any other method approved by the oversight committee;
and
(2) To perform HIV antibody testing on the residue left in a sample of
hypodermic needles and syringes returned to the Program] TO COLLECT RETURNED
NEEDLES AND SYRINGES AND SEND THEM TO THE RAPID ANALYSIS OF DRUGS
PROGRAM OPERATED BY THE CENTER FOR HARM REDUCTION AT THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(d) On or before December 31 of each year, the Baltimore City Health Department
shall report to the oversight committee, the Governor, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the General Assembly, on the number of hypodermic needles
and syringes exchanged as part of the Program.
24–808.
[(a)] No Program staff member or Program participant may be found guilty of
violating § 5–601, § 5–619, § 5–620, § 5–902, or § 5–904 of the Criminal Law Article for
possessing or distributing controlled paraphernalia or drug paraphernalia whenever the
possession or distribution of the controlled paraphernalia or drug paraphernalia is a direct
result of the employee’s or participant’s activities in connection with the work of the
Program authorized under this subtitle.
[(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a Program
staff member or Program participant is not immune from criminal prosecution for:
(1) The redistribution of hypodermic needles or syringes in any form;
(2) Any activities not authorized or approved by the Program; or
(3) The possession or distribution of controlled paraphernalia or drug
paraphernalia or any other unlawful activity outside of the Baltimore City limits.]
24–809.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 758
Except for violations of any laws that could arise from residue attached to or
contained within hypodermic needles or syringes being returned or already returned to the
Program, [nothing in] this subtitle [provides] DOES NOT PROVIDE immunity to a Program
staff member or Program participant from criminal prosecution for a violation of any law
prohibiting or regulating the use, possession, dispensing, distribution, or promotion of
[controlled dangerous substances, dangerous drugs, detrimental drugs, or harmful drugs
or any conspiracy or attempt to commit any of those offenses] ILLICIT DRUGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 7 –